Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 12 Forest Fires and Prevention

2-12-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Authorized representative” means anyone recognized and/or appointed and/or commissioned by the director of the department of natural resources to exercise and pursue the laws, rules and regulations intended by this chapter.

“Authorized senior officer” means a member of a fire organization who is authorized by the fire chief to issue burning permits.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Fire chief” means the elected, appointed, designated or recognized leader and member of a fire organization.

“Flammable material” means any substance that will burn, including but not limited to, refuse, debris, waste forest material, brush, stumps, logs, rubbish, fallen timber, grass, stubble, leaves, fallow land, slash crops or crop residue.

“Forest fire” or “Wildland fire” means any fire occurring on forest land or wildland.

“Forest land” or “Wildland” means timbered land, potential timber producing land, cutover or burned timber land or grass lands not including lands devoted to agriculture.

“Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, municipality or other public body or legal entity or employee or agent of the person.

“Senior officer” means a member of a fire organization who would be next in command during the absence of the fire chief.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-2.
Fire fighting equipment.

The director of environmental management may purchase any special forest fire equipment and supplies that in his or her judgment may be necessary to promptly and quickly extinguish forest fires occurring in the more heavily wooded areas of the state,
and the equipment and supplies shall be located in each of the forest lookout station zones at those places and under any supervision that the director may designate. The equipment and supplies may consist of gas masks, pumps, hose,
brooms, shovels, trucks and similar articles, but the equipment and supplies shall not be purchased until an appropriation is made by the general assembly.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-3.
Lookout stations and appropriations.

For the purpose of protecting the forests from fire, the director of environmental management may expend, within the amount appropriated, a sum sufficient to establish, equip and maintain lookout stations, may purchase or lease necessary land and purchase
material, contract for the construction of lookout stations, employ a watcher at each station established during those periods in each year that the director may deem advisable, and shall fix the rate per hour for those
services. The watchers shall at all times, during their employment, be subject to the control of the director.

The director of environmental management may cooperate in forest protection and may enter into agreements with other states, groups of states and the federal government to provide assistance and accept assistance in the control of fires which may include
training of personnel. Any employee of the department of environmental management assigned to fire control duties or training programs outside this state shall be considered the same as working inside this state for the
purpose of compensation and other employee benefits.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, in addition to any other moneys appropriated for this purpose, any sum as it may deem necessary to be expended under the direction of the department
of environmental management for the purpose of providing for keeping open and operating the forest fire towers in this state throughout twelve (12) months of each year and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw
his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of proper vouchers approved by the director of environmental management,
provided that authority is given to the director of environmental management to utilize the services of the personnel assigned to the operation of forest fire towers for other phases of the forestry, parks and parkways program,
whenever, in his or her discretion, because of certain seasonal weather conditions, forest fire towers are not required to be staffed with a full complement of personnel.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 1972, ch. 80, § 1.

2-12-4.
Conferences of fire chiefs and senior officers.

The director of environmental management may, from time to time, call together the city or town and district fire chiefs and senior officers of the several cities and towns at places as he or she may designate, for conference and for instruction in methods
of forest fire suppression. Fire chiefs and senior officers attending those conferences or meetings for instruction may be allowed their actual expenses incurred for attending not exceeding two (2) conferences or meetings during any
one calendar year and those expenses shall be paid from the appropriation provided for by §

2-11-11

upon vouchers approved by the director of environmental management.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-4

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-5.
Rules and regulations.

The director of the department of environmental management may make any rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, that in his or her judgment may be helpful in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and of preventing and suppressing forest
fires.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-6.
Restrictions on open air fires.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall burn any flammable material on or adjacent to forest land without a written permit from the director of the department of environmental management or, his or her authorized representative,
on forms prepared and under rules and regulations approved by the director, provided whoever sets or maintains a permit fire shall totally extinguish the permit fire before leaving it and the director, or his or her authorized representative,
may cancel or suspend any or all permits, if, in his or her opinion, public necessity requires it. Any person doing any burning on or adjacent to forest land prior to burning operations, and at all times during the continuance of these
operations, shall do that work in and around the area in which the burning is done as may be required by the director by rules and regulations promulgated under the authority granted in §

2-12-5

. Whoever violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be liable to a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) nor less than ten dollars ($10.00) or to imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days
nor less than ten (10) days or both.

History of Section.
P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-7.
Exemption of attended fires.

The provisions of §

2-12-6

do not apply to fires set or maintained in accordance with regulations approved by the director of the department of environmental management or his or her duly authorized representative, or to any act that may be done
under authority given to any incorporated fire district or under the supervision of a fire chief or senior officer in which case the person requesting supervision shall pay for the actual time required for the supervision, to the city
or town fire chief or senior officer, the prevailing rate per hour customarily paid to supervisory employees on construction work in the area or to burning in attended incinerators, fireplaces or rubbish burners, provided that time
of burning and location of the incinerator, fireplace or rubbish burner is such that fires from any incinerator, fireplace or rubbish burner will not endanger any forest and pasture, brush, sprout, waste or cutover woodland or buildings.
The provisions of §

2-12-6

shall not apply to fire chiefs and senior officers, the director of environmental management or any member of the department of environmental management authorized by him or her, when engaged in the discharge of their
duties under this chapter, or to any incorporated volunteer fire company authorized in writing by the director of environmental management while engaged in prevention burning. Whoever sets or maintains any attended fire shall totally
extinguish the attended fire before leaving it and failure to do so shall make the person, upon conviction, liable to a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or less than ten dollars ($10.00) or to imprisonment not exceeding
thirty (30) days nor less than ten (10) days or both, and further they shall be liable in a civil action for the payment to the state or fire company for the expenses incurred by the fire chief or senior officer or any other authorized
forest fire official in attending or suppressing fire or fires as result from that burning.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-8.
Enforcement.

The director of environmental management or any employee of the department authorized by him or her has the powers and is subject to the duties and obligations specified in chapter 7 of title 12 in dealing with any violations of the provisions of chapters
9, 10, 11, 12 and 15 of title 2.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-9.
Causing of fires.

A person shall not:

Dispose of a lighted match, cigarette, cigar, ashes or other flaming or glowing substance or any other substance or thing that is likely to ignite a forest, brush, grass or woods fire, or throw or drop from a moving vehicle any of those objects or substances;

Set a backfire or cause a backfire to be set, except under the direct supervision of an established fire control agency or unless it can be established that the setting of the backfire is necessary for the purpose of saving life or valuable property;

Destroy, break down, mutilate or remove any fire control sign or poster erected by an established fire control agency in the administration of its lawful duties and authorities;

Use or operate on or adjacent to forest land, a welding torch, tar pot, or other device which may cause a fire, without clearing flammable material surrounding the operation or without taking other precautions prescribed by the director to insure against
the starting and spreading of fire;

Operate or cause to be operated any engine, other machinery or powered vehicle not equipped with spark arresters, or other suitable devices to prevent the escape of fire or sparks; or

Discharge or cause to be discharged a gun firing incendiary or tracer bullets or tracer charge on to or across any forest land.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) nor less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-9

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-10.
Fire upon land of another — Penalty — Liability for damages.

Any person being upon the land of another, or upon any highway adjacent to this land, who carelessly sets or maintains, or causes to be set or maintained, fire upon the land of another, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five
dollars ($25.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment for not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person being upon the land of another or upon any highway adjacent to this land, who willfully sets or maintains or willfully causes to be set or maintained fire upon land of another, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than
two thousand dollars ($2,000) nor less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years nor less than thirty (30) days, or both.

Any person who carelessly suffers or permits any fire on his or her own land to extend beyond the limits of their own land, whereby the forest land or property of another are damaged shall upon conviction be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred
dollars ($200) nor less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Any person convicted of the provisions of this section and of §

2-12-6

is liable for all damages caused and to civil action for the payment to the state or local fire company for all expenses incurred by the fire chief or senior officer or any other authorized forest fire official in
attending or suppressing the fire or fires as a result from that action.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-10

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-11.
Fire fighting by fire chiefs and senior officers — Summons of assistance.

If a fire occurs in woodland, the fire chief, and the senior officer of the district in which the fire occurs, shall immediately take any measures that may be necessary, including backfiring and plowing, to control or extinguish the fire, and shall investigate
the causes of fire and report the causes to the director. Any fire chief or senior officer has the authority to summon any use of bulldozers, trucks, and other property adapted to the purpose. Any person who refuses or neglects to
assist or to allow the use of the bulldozers, trucks or other property required, is liable to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). All active members of an organized fire department shall be called as a unit only, the
unit coming under the authority of the officer in charge of the fire department. The fire chief or senior officer in charge of a fire shall keep an account of the time of all persons assisting him or her, and a schedule of all property
used.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-11

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 23, § 4.

2-12-12.
Posting of statutory provisions.

Notices containing a statement of §§

2-12-6

,

2-12-8

,

2-12-10

—

2-12-12

, and §

2-12-19

, furnished by the director of the department of environmental management, shall be posted in suitable places by the fire chief.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-12

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-13.
Proclamation of hazardous conditions — Closing of forests.

Whenever in his or her opinion an unusual forest fire hazard exists, the director of environmental management shall notify the governor, who has the authority to forbid by proclamation, any person or persons entering forests, woodlands or open lands in
any parts of the state that he or she deems the public interest requires, and may by that proclamation suspend any woods operations and open season for taking fish, birds and quadrupeds. The proclamation shall be in full force
and effect immediately after notice is given in the manner the governor may determine, and shall remain in force until rescinded by the governor. This does not prevent entry into forest or woodland areas by forest fire suppression
agents, law enforcement agents, legal residents of those areas or persons engaged in pursuits necessary to the public health and welfare or, by any agency or person authorized by the state director of environmental management.

Any authorized representative or representatives of the director of environmental management, as well as state and local police authorities, shall enforce the provisions of the proclamation. Any person or persons violating any of the provisions of this
section shall be liable to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) or imprisonment for not more than ten (10) days.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-13

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-14.
Closing of fishing and hunting seasons during drought.

Whenever during an open season for the hunting of any kind of game, or for fishing for any kind of fish, it appears to the governor that by reason of extreme drought the presence of hunters and persons fishing is likely to cause forest fires, he or she
may, by proclamation, suspend the open season and make it a closed season for any time he or she may designate and may prohibit the discharge of firearms or the building of open fires on or near forest land during that time.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-14

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-15.
Emergency powers of director.

Whenever, in his or her opinion, an unusual forest fire hazard exists, the governor shall in writing, notify the director of environmental management, and shall likewise notify the director when in his or her opinion the hazard has ceased to exist. Between
the dates of the receipt by him or her of the notices, the director has full charge of the hazard and all fire chiefs and senior officers shall obey his or her orders or those of his or her authorized representatives; and he and she
and his or her authorized representatives shall have all the powers of fire chiefs and senior officers and the director of the department of environmental management may establish rates of payment for equipment used in the prevention
and suppression of forest fires. Any time during this period of unusual forest fire hazard, the director may prohibit, by a written directive filed with the secretary of state and by public announcement, all open air fires and any
other activity conducted in the open air that creates a forest or wildland fire hazard, in any areas of the state that he or she deems necessary to protect the health and property of the people of the state. Any person, firm or corporation
who violates a directive, upon conviction, shall be liable to a fine not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) nor less than fifty dollars ($50.00) or not exceeding ninety (90) days nor less than thirty (30) days’ imprisonment or
both for each offense and each day shall be considered a separate offense.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-15

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-16.
Compensation of emergency fire fighters.

Between the dates the state shall, upon vouchers approved by the director of environmental management and out of the appropriation provided for by §

2-11-11

, pay fully, at the rate of the existing minimum wage per hour as set by the minimum wage law, all persons not resident of the city or town or fire district where they are employed by the director in fighting a forest
fire and pay, at a rate prescribed by the director for all equipment and supplies coming from outside the city or town or fire district where they are to be used and authorized by the director in fighting forest fires but all other
expenses shall be paid as provided in §

2-11-6

. The expense of the authorized representatives of the director shall be paid out of the appropriation authorized by §

2-11-11

.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-16

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-17.
Right of fire fighters and officials to enter land.

No action of trespass shall lie against any person crossing or working upon the land of another to extinguish fire or to the director of environmental management or his or her representatives from crossing or working upon lands of another to investigate
fire.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-17

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-18.
Disposition of fines — Limitation of prosecutions.

All fines recovered by virtue of this chapter and chapter 11 of this title shall be equally divided between the complainant and the forest fire district in which the offense was committed, and all prosecutions shall be commenced within three (3) years
after the commission of the offense and not afterwards.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-18

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-19.
Enforcement and prosecutions.

It is the duty of the director of the department of environmental management or his or her duly authorized representative to enforce the provisions of this chapter and chapter 11 of this title and to prosecute any person, firm or corporation who, in his
or her opinion, is guilty of the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter and in all prosecutions the director or his or her authorized representative is not required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for costs.
It is the duty of the attorney general to conduct the prosecution brought by the director under the provisions of this chapter and chapter 11 of this title.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-19

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-20.
Civil liability of dump operator.

Every person, firm, corporation or public agency who maintains a dump on owned, rented or leased property is liable in a civil action for the payment to the state or fire company for the expenses incurred by the fire chief or senior officer, or any other
authorized forest fire official, in attending or suppressing forest fire as a result of burning in that dump and shall further be liable in civil action for any damage to another’s property by fire as a result of burning in that dump.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-20

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.

2-12-21.
Collection of fire suppression charges.

In lieu of any civil action that may be brought for the payment to the state or fire company for expenses incurred by a fire chief or senior officer, or authorized forest fire official in attending and suppressing a forest fire, the director of the department
of environmental management, or his or her authorized representative, or the fire company jurisdiction or fire district in which the fire occurs, may submit to and collect from the person, firm, corporation or public agency causing
the fire all charges for forest fire suppression costs. In the event those charges are submitted by a fire company or fire district to collect for suppression costs to any person, firm, corporation or public agency causing the
fire, no payment shall be made by the state to the fire company or fire district as provided in §§

2-11-6

,

2-12-6

and

2-12-16

. Within seven (7) days after the date of the fire, any fire chief of a fire company or fire district affected shall notify the director of the department of environmental management of his or her intention to submit
suppression charges to any person, firm or corporation.

All suppression charges recovered by the department of environmental management shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state and a proper record shall be made of these suppression charges recovered.

History of Section. G.L. 1956, §

2-12-21

; P.L. 1970, ch. 124, § 4.